Utah statutes.
32B-6-705.   Specific licensing requirements for on-premise beer retailer license.

(1)  To obtain an on-premise beer retailer license a person shall comply with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, except that an on-premise beer retailer is required to carry dramshop insurance coverage in accordance with Section 32B-5-201 only if the on-premise beer retailer sells more than $5,000 of beer annually.

(2) (a)  An on-premise beer retailer license expires on the last day of February each year.

(b)  To renew a person's on-premise beer retailer license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than January 31.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for an on-premise beer retailer license is $300.

(b) (i)  The initial license fee for an on-premise beer retailer license that is not a tavern is $300.

(ii)  The initial license fee for an on-premise beer retailer license that is a tavern is $1,500.

(c) (i)  The renewal fee for an on-premise beer retailer license that is not a tavern is $350.

(ii)  The renewal fee for an on-premise beer retailer license that is a tavern is $1,250.

(4)  The bond amount required for an on-premise beer retailer license is the penal sum of $5,000.

(5)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this part, if an applicant is a state agency or political subdivision of the state it is not required to:

(a)  pay an application fee, initial license fee, or renewal fee;

(b)  obtain the written consent of the local authority;

(c)  submit a copy of the applicant's current business license; or

(d)  post a bond as specified by Section 32B-5-204.

